Georgia, session 2025_26, HB602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions relative to education, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
H. B. 602
- 1 -

LC 61 0093
"ARTICLE 5
20-1-50.
As used in this article, the term:
(1) 'Academic year' means a period of time, typically nine months, in which a full-time
student is expected to complete the equivalent of at least two semesters or three quarters
of academic work.
(2) 'Campus' means the grounds and buildings owned or occupied by a postsecondary
educational institution.
(3) 'Convicted' or 'conviction' refers to a plea of guilty, a finding of guilty by a court of
competent jurisdiction, or the acceptance of a plea of nolo contendere or affording of first
offender treatment by a court of competent jurisdiction, irrespective of the pendency or
availability of any appeal or application for collateral relief.
(4) 'Criminal offense' means any criminal offense under Title 16 or any offense under
federal law.
(5) 'Date of conviction' means the date on which the trial court determines guilt and
enters judgment thereon or the date on which the court accepts a plea of nolo contendere
or formally allows a person to receive first offender treatment.
(6) 'Harassment' means unwelcome conduct or expressive activity directed at a student,
administrator, faculty, staff, or visitor on campus that is so severe, pervasive, and
objectively offensive that he or she is effectively denied equal access to opportunities or
benefits provided by the postsecondary educational institution.
(7)(A) 'Materially and substantially disruptive conduct' means a person intentionally
engaging in conduct or expressive activity which such person knows or reasonably
should have known would significantly hinder another person's or group's expressive
activity, prevent the communication of the person's or group's message, or prevent the
transaction of the business of a lawful meeting, gathering, or procession by:
H. B. 602
- 2 -

LC 61 0093
(i) Engaging in fighting, violence, or other unlawful behavior;
(ii) Damaging or defacing property;
(iii) Physically blocking, using threats of violence, or creating loud or sustained noise
or vocalization intended to prevent any person from attending, listening to, viewing,
or otherwise participating in an expressive activity;
(iv) Occupying or materially disrupting the ingress, egress, or use of campus facilities
without consent of the postsecondary educational institution;
(v) Materially violating reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions made by the
postsecondary educational institution; or
(vi) Engaging in harassment at the postsecondary educational institution.
(B) Conduct or expressive activity shall not be considered materially and substantially
disruptive conduct if it is protected under the Georgia Constitution or the First
Amendment to the United States Constitution, including, but not limited to, lawful
protests in an unrestricted outdoor area of campus, except during times when such areas
have been reserved in advance for other events, or minor, brief, or fleeting nonviolent
disruptions of events that are isolated and short in duration.
(8) 'Postsecondary educational institution' shall have the same meaning as 'eligible
postsecondary institution' as set forth in Code Section 20-3-519.
(9) 'Student' means any person who is enrolled as a student in courses for academic
credit on a full-time, part-time, temporary, or intermittent basis in any postsecondary
educational institution.
20-1-51.
(a) Any student who is convicted of a criminal offense and any student who is determined
by a postsecondary educational institution to have violated such postsecondary educational
institution's code of conduct for students, when such conviction or determination is the
result of a student engaging in materially and substantially disruptive conduct on the
H. B. 602
- 3 -

LC 61 0093
campus of such postsecondary educational institution, shall as of the date of such
conviction or determination be denied state funds for any loans, grants, or scholarships
provided for in Article 7 of Chapter 3 of this title.
(b) Such denial of state funds shall be effective as of the first day of the term, quarter,
semester, or other similar period for which such student was enrolled immediately
following the date of such conviction or determination and shall continue for a period of
two academic years.
(c) Any postsecondary educational institution operating within this state that receives state
funds shall agree to comply with this article in order to be eligible for its students to receive
state funds for any loans, grants, or scholarships provided for in Article 7 of Chapter 3 of
this title.
20-1-52.
The Georgia Student Finance Commission, in consultation with the University System of
Georgia and the Technical College System of Georgia, shall promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. Such rules and regulations
shall provide for relief from sanctions previously imposed under this article against a
person whose conviction or determination that he or she violated the applicable code of
conduct is subsequently overturned on appeal or through collateral relief."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 602
- 4 -